Arkansas, session 2025, HB1434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-13-101(c), concerning the award of
custody in a case concerning child custody or visitation when a party has
committed an act of domestic violence, is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) If a party to an action concerning custody of or a right to
visitation with a child has committed an act of domestic violence abuse as
defined in the Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, § 9-15-101 et seq., against the
party making the allegation or a family or household member of either party
and such allegations are proven by a preponderance of the evidence at a
hearing on the merits, the circuit court must shall consider the effect of
such domestic violence abuse upon the best interests of the child, whether
or not the child was physically injured or personally witnessed the abuse,
together with such facts and circumstances as the circuit court deems
relevant in making a directive pursuant to this section.
*LJH033*
03-10-2025 11:03:45 LJH033

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 H3/10/25 HB1434
(2) With regard to an award of custody:
(A) There is a rebuttable presumption that it is not in
the best interest of the child to be placed in the sole, primary, or joint
custody of an abusive a parent in cases in which there is a finding by the
preponderance of the evidence that the parent or other party has engaged in a
pattern of domestic abuse. or other party who has been found at a hearing on
the merits to have engaged in a pattern of domestic abuse as defined in the
Domestic Abuse Act of 1991, § 9-15-101 et seq.
(B) The parent or other party that has been found to have
committed domestic abuse has the burden of rebutting the presumption under
subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section by proving by a preponderance of the
evidence that having custody of the child will not endanger the physical,
mental, or emotional health of the child.
(3) With regard to an award of reasonable parenting time provided for
in subdivision (b)(1)(A)(vii) of this section to a parent or other party who
fails to rebut the presumption under subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section, a
court awarding unsupervised parenting time to that parent or other party:
(A) Shall, in addition to the facts, findings, and
conclusions of law in the court's written order under subdivision (b)(3)(A)
of this section, make findings as to:
(i) Whether the parent or other party poses an
ongoing risk of harm to the child's physical, mental, or emotional health;
and
(ii) Why the parent or other party who committed the
domestic abuse does not present a risk of harm to the child; and
(B) May order safety conditions and completion of a
certified domestic violence intervention program for the parent or other
party's visits with the child.

/s/Hudson






03-10-2025 11:03:45 LJH033